Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7435
Drug sample, defined.

Drug sample means a unit of a prescription drug intended to promote the sale of the drug and not intended to be sold.

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 8;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-7408;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 9.